Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.030

Endowment—General powers.

The endowment has all the general powers necessary to carry out its purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers. In addition to other powers specified in this chapter, the endowment may:

(1) Sue and be sued in its own name;

(2) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or entity, including commercial entities, in accordance with this chapter;

(3) Employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, financial advisors, auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and such other personnel as are necessary or desirable to implement this chapter;

(4) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the purposes of this chapter; and

(5) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2018 c 4 s 3; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 4.]